Maryland, session 2026, HB0615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Health care provider” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0615*

HOUSE BILL 615
(i) A person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under
the Health Occupations Article or § 13–516 of the Education Article to provide health care
in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession or in an approved education or
training program; or
(ii) A facility where health care is provided to patients or recipients,
including [a]:
1. A facility as defined in § 10–101(g) of this article[, a];
2. A hospital as defined in § 19–301 of this article[, a];
3. A related institution as defined in § 19–301 of this article[,
a];
4. A health maintenance organization as defined in §
19–701(g) of this article[, an];
5. AN outpatient clinic[, a];
6. A medical laboratory[, a];
7. A comprehensive crisis response center[, a]
8. A crisis stabilization center[, and a]
9. A crisis treatment center established under § 7.5–207 of
this article; AND
10. A CRISIS PREGNANCY CLINIC, INCLUDING A MOBILE
FACILITY THAT PROVIDES PREGNANCY–RELATED HEALTH CARE AND IS NOT A
COVERED ENTITY UNDER THE FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.
(2) “Health care provider” includes the agents, employees, officers, and
directors of a facility and the agents and employees of a health care provider.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.